Hawaii statutes.
DIVISION
4. COURTS AND JUDICIAL PROCEEDINGS

Note

Pursuant to article VI, section 7 of the state constitution,
the supreme court promulgated rules having the force and effect of law.
Statutes relating to process, practice, procedure, and appeals remain in force
and effect if, but only if, they are not in conflict with the rules of court.
Accordingly, the procedural statutes set out in this division should be
compared with the rules of court to ascertain whether they have been superseded
in whole or in part. As to applicability of rules, see HRCP rules 1 and 81;
HRPP rules 1 and 54; RCC rules 1.1, 32, and 34; HAR rule 2; RDC rules 1.1 and
31; DCRCP rules 1 and 81; RSCD rule 1; HFCR rules 1 and 81; HRAP rules 1, 2,
and 2.1; see also Rules of the Supreme Court, Hawaii Rules of Professional
Conduct, Hawaii Revised Code of Judicial Conduct, Rules of the Intermediate
Court of Appeals, Rules of the Tax Appeal Court, and Rules of the Land Court.

Rules of Court

See also Hawaii Appellate Mediation Program Rules; Hawaii
Probate Rules; Hawaii Civil Traffic Rules; Rules Governing Court Reporting;
Hawaii Rules for Certification of Spoken and Sign Language Interpreters.

TITLE 32.
COURTS AND COURT

OFFICERS

Chapter

601 Courts Generally

602 Courts of Appeal

603 Circuit Courts

604 District Courts

604A Environmental Courts

605 Attorneys

606 Clerks, Reporters, Interpreters, Etc.

607 Costs and Fees

608 Expenses and Salaries

609 Jurors--Repealed

610 Retirement and Removal of Justices and Judges--Repealed

611 Counsel and Other Services For Indigent
Defendants--

Repealed

612 Jurors

613 Center for Alternative Dispute Resolution

CHAPTER
601

COURTS
GENERALLY

Section

601-1 Judiciary

601-1.5 Emergency period; suspension of deadlines

601-2 Administration

601-3 Administrative director

601-3.2 Reporting of non-general fund information

601-3.5 Supreme court law library revolving fund

601-3.6 Spouse and child abuse special account;
judiciary

601-3.7 Judiciary computer system special fund

601-4 Judicial council

601-5 Independence of judiciary

601-6 Repealed

601-7 Disqualification of judge; relationship,
pecuniary

interest, previous judgment, bias or
prejudice

601-8 Practice of law forbidden

601-9 Same, other instances

601-10 to 12 Repealed

601-13 Publication of notices and process

601-14 Repealed

601-15 Style of process

601-16 Repealed

601-17 Use of credit and debit cards to pay for
court

costs, fees, expenses, and other charges

601-17.5 Collection of delinquent court-ordered
payments

601-18 Interest income

601-20 Court annexed arbitration program

601-21 Substance abuse treatment monitoring
program

Sheriff

601-31 to 38 Repealed

Security Personnel

601-51 Repealed

Note

Decriminalizing minor offenses. L 2005, c 124; L 2008, c
101.

Cross References

Commission on salaries, see §26-56.

Intermediate sanctions for selected offenders and defendants,
see §§353-10.5, 353-63.5, and 706-605.1.

Rules of Court

Court interpreter certification program, see Hawaii Rules for
Certification of Spoken and Sign Language Interpreters.

Law Journals and Reviews

Judicial Independence: The Hawaii Experience. 2 UH L. Rev.
1 (1979).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next